Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202655-131
Adjutant General; property; receipt as trustee; control; disposition; Military Department Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Military Department Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the Adjutant General. The fund shall consist of transfers authorized by the Legislature and all nonfederal revenue received by the National Guard pursuant to this section.

(2) The Adjutant General is hereby authorized to accept by devise, gift, or otherwise and hold, as trustee, for the benefit and use of the National Guard or any part thereof any property, real or personal; to invest and reinvest the property; to collect, receive, and recover the rents, incomes, and issues from the property; and to expend them as provided by the terms of the devise or gift, or if not so provided, to expend them for the benefit and use of the National Guard as he or she in his or her discretion shall determine, subject to the approval of the Governor. Except as otherwise provided by law, all other money received by the National Guard and derived from any other source shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Military Department Cash Fund.

(3) The Military Department Cash Fund may be used for expenses related to the support of any military installation located in Nebraska. For purposes of this section, military installation means a base, camp, post, station, yard, center, armory, or other activity under the jurisdiction of the United States Department of Defense or the Nebraska Military Department. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Military Department Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 20, p. 662;

C.S.1929, § 55-126;

R.S.1943, § 55-150;

Laws 1965, c. 342, § 1, p. 973;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-150;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 29, p. 1591;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 55, p. 2379;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 61;

Laws 2006, LB 787, § 9;

Laws 2007, LB322, § 9;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 31;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 147.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.